src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
| Flag | Explanation
| --- | --- 
|  **@U.pron.nom@** | tbw
|  **@U.pron.gen@** | tbw
|  **@U.pron.gen2@** | tbw
|  **@U.pron.ill@** | tbw
|  **@U.pron.par@** | tbw
|  **@U.pron.par2@** | tbw
|  **@U.pron.par3@** | tbw
|  **@U.pron.ess@** | tbw
|  **@U.pron.tra@** | tbw
|  **@U.pron.ine@** | tbw
|  **@U.pron.ela@** | tbw
|  **@U.pron.all@** | tbw
|  **@U.pron.ade@** | tbw
|  **@U.pron.abl@** | tbw
|  **@P.compound.block@** | tbw
|  **@D.compound.block@** | tbw

| Flag diacritic | Explanation
| :------------- |:-----------
| @U.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.ten@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

| @P.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.ten@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @P.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

## Basic lexica, pointing to the other lexicon files

Here is the Root lexicon, pointing to all the parts of speech:

 **LEXICON Root**

* AdjectiveRoot ;
* Adverb ;
* Conjunction ;
* Interjection ;
* NUM ;
* NounRoot ;
* Particle ;
* Postposition ;
* Preposition ;
* Pronoun ;
* @U.Cap.Obl@ ProperNoun ;
* @U.Cap.Opt@ ProperNoun ;
* Punctuation ;
* Symbols ;
* VerbRoot ;
* Subjunction ;
* Abbreviation ;
* Acronym ;

**LEXICON Acronym** pointing to:
* Acronym-fkv ;
* Acronym-smi ;

**LEXICON Abbreviation** pointing to:
* Abbreviation-fkv ;
* Abbreviation-smi ;

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fkv/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
